Nebraska, session 109, LB216.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, in any county where the
duties of the clerk of the district court are being performed by the
county clerk as ex officio clerk of the district court, such duties shall
be transferred to the clerk magistrate for such county.
(2)(a) At any time after the operative date of this section, the
Supreme Court may request the judges of the district courts and county
courts of a district court judicial district, in consultation with the
clerk magistrates in the judicial district, to develop a consolidation
plan relating to the transfer of duties described in subsection (1) of
this section or relating to consolidating the duties of the clerk of the
district court and the clerk magistrate into the position of clerk of the
district and county courts.
(b) The consolidation plan shall address, but need not be limited
to, the following matters: Office space, facilities, assignment of
duties, selection of an administrative judge from within the district for
the purpose of administration of the consolidation plan, and personnel
structure. In developing the consolidation plan, interests and comments
from the public and attorneys who regularly practice in the county shall
be considered.
(c) The consolidation plan shall be submitted to the State Court
Administrator in a format prescribed by the administrator within one
hundred twenty days after the request of the Supreme Court. A majority of
the judges affected by the consolidation shall approve the plan prior to
submission to the State Court Administrator. A consolidation plan shall
not become effective unless approved by the Supreme Court.
(d) If a plan is not submitted by the deadline provided in
subdivision (2)(c) of this section, the Supreme Court shall develop a
substitute consolidation plan.
(e) Under a consolidation plan, each county shall be responsible for
all costs involved in establishing, furnishing, and maintaining
appropriate office space or facilities for the clerk of the district and
-3-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
county courts and such clerk's employees.
Sec. 2. Before assuming the duties of clerk of the district court
or the clerk of the district and county courts, a clerk magistrate shall
take the oath prescribed by law for district court judges. Such oath
shall be filed with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 7, 2027, all elected clerks of the
district courts and such clerks' employees shall become state employees
under the Supreme Court.
(2) On or before a date selected by the Supreme Court, each affected
county board shall provide the Supreme Court with information concerning
accrual rate value for sick leave and vacation leave concerning such
clerks and employees.
(3)(a) The State of Nebraska shall directly pay, with funds
appropriated to the Supreme Court, all salaries, benefits, and expenses
of such transferred clerks and employees. No such transferred clerk or
employee shall incur a loss of income as a result of becoming a state
employee pursuant to this section.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, income means the salary of a
transferred clerk or employee on the day prior to becoming a state
employee.
(c) The salary for any new position relating to the functions of the
clerk of the district court that is created after the operative date of
this section and any change of benefits or salary which is inconsistent
with other county salary adjustments made after the operative date of
this section shall be at the discretion of the Supreme Court.
(4) Transferred clerks and employees shall continue state employment
unless removed for cause pursuant to personnel rules of the Supreme
Court.
(5)(a) All furniture, computers, equipment, and personal property
owned by the county and used to perform district court functions prior to
the transfer shall remain the property of the county.
-4-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(b) All books, files, and records used to perform district court
functions shall be transferred to the State Court Administrator.
Sec. 4. (1)(a) This subsection does not apply to any county
containing a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary
class.
(b) Section 84-1332 shall apply to any elected clerk of the district
court or such clerk's employee who is a member of the Retirement System
for Nebraska Counties and who becomes a state employee as provided in
section 3 of this act.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that such transfer of such
clerks and employees shall not result in any loss of accrued retirement
benefits as such benefits existed on the date of the employment transfer.
It is further the intent of the Legislature that any additional costs
involved in the transfer of retirement benefits shall be shared by the
county and the State of Nebraska and the additional costs shall be
allocated proportionately based on:
(i) The number of years any such clerk or employee were employed by
the county before the date of the employment transfer; and
(ii) The number of years any such clerk or employee were employed by
the state after the date of the employment at the time of the clerk's or
employee's retirement.
(2)(a) This subsection shall only apply to a county containing a
city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary class.
(b) Subsection (1) of section 84-1332 shall not apply to any elected
clerk of the district court or such clerk's employee who becomes a state
employee as provided in section 3 of this act. Such persons shall be
eligible for immediate participation in the State Employees Retirement
System of the State of Nebraska as provided in subsection (2) of section
84-1332.
Sec. 5. (1) No clerk or employee who becomes a state employee under
section 3 of this act shall lose any accrual rate value for his or her
-5-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
sick leave and vacation leave hours as a result of becoming a state
employee.
(2) A county shall transfer all accrued sick leave of a transferred
employee up to the maximum number of accumulated hours for sick leave
allowed by the personnel rules of the Supreme Court, not to exceed one
thousand four hundred forty hours. The county shall reimburse the state
within a reasonable time after the transfer for twenty-five percent of
the value of such accrued sick leave hours based on the straight-time
rate of pay for the employee. For any accrued sick leave hours which are
in excess of the amount that can be transferred, the county shall
reimburse the employee within a reasonable time for twenty-five percent
of the value of the sick leave hours based on the straight-time rate of
pay for the employee.
(3) An elected clerk of the district court who becomes a state
employee and who does not have any accrued sick leave shall be granted
the number of hours of annual sick leave based upon his or her years of
service as a clerk, as allowed by the personnel rules of the Supreme
Court, not to exceed one thousand four hundred forty hours of sick leave.
The county shall reimburse the state for twenty-five percent of the value
of sick leave hours granted based on the straight-time rate of pay for
the clerk.
(4) A transferred employee may transfer accrued vacation leave
earned as a county employee in an amount up to the maximum amount allowed
by the personnel rules of the Supreme Court, not to exceed two hundred
eighty hours. The county shall reimburse the state within a reasonable
time after the transfer for one hundred percent of the value of the hours
of accrued vacation leave transferred based on the employee's straight-
time rate of pay. The county shall reimburse the employee within a
reasonable time for one hundred percent of the hours of any accrued
vacation leave in excess of the amount which may be transferred based on
the employee's straight-time rate of pay.
-6-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(5) A clerk of the district court who becomes a state employee and
who does not have any accrued vacation leave shall be granted the number
of hours of annual vacation leave based on his or her service as a clerk,
as allowed under the personnel rules of the Supreme Court, not to exceed
two hundred eighty hours of vacation leave. The county shall reimburse
the state for one hundred percent of the value of the hours of vacation
leave granted based on the straight-time rate of pay for the clerk.
(6) A transferred employee or clerk shall not receive any additional
accrual rate value for sick leave or vacation leave until the
qualifications are met for the increased accrual rate values pursuant to
the requirements of the sick or vacation leave allowed by the personnel
rules of the Supreme Court.
(7) A transferred employee and his or her dependents may participate
in and be covered by the Nebraska State Insurance Program established by
sections 84-1601 to 84-1615. Any waiting period for such health insurance
coverage is waived.
Sec. 6. (1) This section applies beginning January 7, 2027, and
prior to such date in the event of a vacancy in the position of an
elected clerk of the district court.
(2) In each county a clerk of the district court shall be appointed.
The clerk shall be appointed by the district judges of the county and
shall serve at such judges' pleasure, subject to personnel rules of the
Supreme Court.
(3) A person may be appointed to serve as clerk of the district
court for more than one county.
(4) Before assuming the duties of office, a clerk of the district
court shall take the oath prescribed by law for district court judges.
Such oath shall be filed with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 7. (1) This section applies beginning January 7, 2027, and
prior to such date in the event of a vacancy in the position of an
elected clerk of the district court.
-7-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(2) In any county if the position of clerk of the district court or
clerk magistrate is vacant, the Supreme Court may request the judges of
the district court and county court, in consultation with the clerk of
the district court or clerk magistrate, to develop a consolidation plan
to provide for consolidation of the duties of clerk of the district court
and clerk magistrate into the position of clerk of the district and
county courts in the county.
(3) The consolidation plan shall address, but need not be limited
to, the following matters: Office space, facilities, assignment of
duties, selection of an administrative judge from within the district for
the purpose of administration of the consolidation plan, and personnel
structure. In developing the consolidation plan, interests and comments
from the public and attorneys who regularly practice in the county shall
be considered.
(4) The consolidation plan shall be submitted to the State Court
Administrator in a format prescribed by the administrator within one
hundred twenty days after the request of the Supreme Court. A majority of
the judges affected by the consolidation shall approve the plan prior to
submission to the State Court Administrator. A consolidation plan shall
not become effective unless approved by the Supreme Court.
(5) If a plan is not submitted by the deadline provided in
subsection (4) of this section, the Supreme Court shall develop a
substitute consolidation plan.
(6) Under a consolidation plan, the county shall be responsible for
all costs involved in establishing, furnishing, and maintaining
appropriate office space or facilities for the clerk of the district and
county courts and such clerk's employees.
Sec. 8. (1) A county board may request in writing that the State
Court Administrator review office space or facilities provided by the
county for the district, separate juvenile, and county courts to
determine if such courts can reduce or eliminate the need for office
-8-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
space or facilities within county-owned buildings. The State Court
Administrator shall respond in writing to such request within thirty days
after receiving the request. The final decision with respect to
maintaining, increasing, reducing, or eliminating office space or
facilities provided by such county shall be made by the county board.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the Supreme Court from:
(a) Establishing minimum standards for courtroom and office space or
facilities. The Supreme Court may establish such standards by class of
county and based on population, caseload, and other pertinent factors and
after consultation with a representative group of county officials; or
(b) Exercising general administrative authority over all courts in
the state and requesting the judges of the district courts, separate
juvenile courts, and county courts of a judicial district, in
consultation with the clerks of the district courts and clerk magistrates
in the judicial district, from developing a plan to consolidate the
positions of clerk of the district court and clerk of the county court
into the position of clerk of the district and county courts for the
county.
Sec. 9. Nothing in sections 1 to 8 of this act shall prevent a
review and subsequent reduction of staff or consolidation of appropriate
office space or facilities.
Sec. 10. Section 11-119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
11-119 The following named officers shall execute a bond with
penalties of the following amounts:
(1) The Governor, one hundred thousand dollars;
(2) The Lieutenant Governor, one hundred thousand dollars;
(3) The Auditor of Public Accounts, one hundred thousand dollars;
(4) The Secretary of State, one hundred thousand dollars;
(5) The Attorney General, one hundred thousand dollars;
(6) The State Treasurer, not less than one million dollars and not
-9-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
more than double the amount of money that may come into his or her hands,
to be fixed by the Governor;
(7) Each county attorney, a sum not less than one thousand dollars
to be fixed by the county board;
(8) Each clerk of the district court, not less than five thousand
dollars or more than one hundred thousand dollars to be determined by the
county board. Beginning January 7, 2027, this subdivision does not apply;
(9) Each county clerk, not less than one thousand dollars or more
than one hundred thousand dollars to be determined by the county board,
except that when a county clerk also has the duties of other county
offices the minimum bond shall be two thousand dollars;
(10) Each county treasurer, not less than ten thousand dollars and
not more than the amount of money that may come into his or her hands, to
be determined by the county board;
(11) Each sheriff, in counties of not more than twenty thousand
inhabitants, five thousand dollars, and in counties over twenty thousand
inhabitants, ten thousand dollars;
(12) Each district superintendent of public instruction, one
thousand dollars;
(13) Each county surveyor, five hundred dollars;
(14) Each county commissioner or supervisor, in counties of not more
than twenty thousand inhabitants, one thousand dollars, in counties over
twenty thousand and not more than thirty thousand inhabitants, two
thousand dollars, in counties over thirty thousand and not more than
fifty thousand inhabitants, three thousand dollars, and in counties over
fifty thousand inhabitants, five thousand dollars;
(15) Each register of deeds in counties having a population of more
than sixteen thousand five hundred inhabitants, not less than two
thousand dollars or more than one hundred thousand dollars to be
determined by the county board;
(16) Each township clerk, two hundred fifty dollars;
-10-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(17) Each township treasurer, two thousand dollars;
(18) Each county assessor, not more than five thousand dollars and
not less than two thousand dollars;
(19) Each school district treasurer, not less than five hundred
dollars or more than double the amount of money that may come into his or
her hands, the amount to be fixed by the president and secretary of the
district;
(20) Each road overseer, two hundred fifty dollars;
(21) Each member of a county weed district board and the manager
thereof, such amount as may be determined by the county board of
commissioners or supervisors of each county with the same amount to apply
to each member of any particular board;
(22) In any county, in lieu of the individual bonds required to be
furnished by county officers, a schedule, position, or blanket bond or
undertaking may be given by county officers, or a single corporate surety
fidelity, schedule, position, or blanket bond or undertaking covering all
the officers, including officers required by law to furnish an individual
bond or undertaking, may be furnished. The county may pay the premium for
the bond. The bond shall be, at a minimum, an aggregate of the amounts
fixed by law or by the person or board authorized by law to fix the
amounts, and with such terms and conditions as may be required by
sections 11-101 to 11-130; and
(23) Each learning community coordinating council treasurer, not
less than five hundred dollars or more than double the amount of money
that may come into his or her hands, the amount to be fixed by the
learning community coordinating council.
All other state officers, department heads, and employees shall be
bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.
Sec. 11. Section 11-125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
11-125 (1) For purposes of this section, covered official means any:
-11-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(a) County If any county treasurer, county attorney, clerk of the
district court, county clerk, county assessor, register of deeds, county
sheriff, county commissioner or supervisor; ,
(b) Until January 7, 2027, clerk of the district court; or
(c) An acting officer who is appointed as provided by section
32-561.
(2) If any covered official furnishes a bond executed by a surety
company authorized by the laws of this state to execute such bond and
such bond is approved by the county board, then the county may pay the
premium for such bond. Any surety bond so executed and approved shall
contain a covenant to the effect that when the stated term of the bond is
reduced to a shorter term by reason of the death, resignation, or removal
from office of such official for a cause not imposing liability on the
bond, the obligor shall refund to the county the unearned portion of the
premium so paid for the term of the bond subject to a reasonable minimum
premium charge.
Sec. 12. Section 11-126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
11-126 (1) For purposes of this section, covered deputy or employee
means:
(a) Any Whenever any deputy or employee of any county treasurer,
county attorney, clerk of the district court, county clerk, county
assessor, register of deeds, county sheriff, or county commissioner or
supervisor; or
(b) Until January 7, 2027, any deputy or employee of the clerk of
the district court.
(2) Whenever a covered deputy or employee is shall be required by
law or the order of the county board of any county to supply bond, either
(a) (1) such deputy or employee shall furnish a bond by a surety company,
which bond shall be approved by the county board, and the county may pay
the premium for such bond; or (b) (2) the county board may arrange and
-12-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
pay for the writing of a blanket corporate surety bond for the benefit of
the county, bonding (i) (a) all such employees of the county or (ii) (b)
all such deputy county officials or (iii) (c) both subdivisions (i) (a)
and (ii) (b) of this subdivision.
Sec. 13. Section 22-417, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
22-417 (1) Any county may consolidate the office of clerk of the
district court, county assessor, county clerk, county engineer, county
surveyor, or register of deeds, except that the consolidated officeholder
shall meet the qualifications of each office as required by law. The
consolidated office shall have the powers and duties provided by law for
each office consolidated. The county board may adopt a resolution for the
consolidation of any of such offices and submit the issue of the
consolidated office to the registered voters for approval at the next
general election or at a special election called for such purpose. The
county board shall hold a public hearing prior to adoption of a
resolution for the consolidation of offices and shall give notice of the
hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county once each week for three consecutive weeks prior to the hearing.
Final publication shall be within seven calendar days prior to the
hearing. The notice shall describe the offices to be consolidated and
that the holder of the offices to be consolidated shall have his or her
term of office end on the first Thursday after the first Tuesday in
January following the general election in which the holder of the
consolidated office is elected.
(2) The county board shall adopt the resolution for the
consolidation of offices by majority vote of the board and shall submit
the issue of consolidation to the registered voters for approval at the
next general election or at a special election called for such purpose.
For each consolidated office submitted for approval, the question shall
be submitted to the voters in substantially the following form:
-13-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
"Shall (name of each office proposed to be consolidated) be
consolidated into one consolidated office according to the resolution
adopted by the county board of (name of county) on (date of adoption of
the resolution by the county board)? Yes No".
(3) If the majority of the registered voters in the county voting on
the question vote in favor of consolidation, the consolidated office
shall be filled at the next general election, and the terms of the
incumbents shall end on the first Thursday after the first Tuesday in
January following the general election in which the holder of the
consolidated office is elected.
(4) The term of a consolidated officer shall be four years or until
his or her successor is elected and qualified, except that the term of a
consolidated officer elected in the year 2000 or any fourth year
thereafter shall be two years or until his or her successor is elected
and qualified.
(5) Any election under this section shall be in accordance with the
Election Act.
Sec. 14. Section 23-120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-120 (1)(a) (1) The county board shall acquire, purchase,
construct, renovate, remodel, furnish, equip, add to, improve, or provide
a suitable courthouse, jail, and other county buildings and a site or
sites for such buildings therefor and for such purposes borrow money and
issue the bonds of the county to pay for the same. Agreements entered
into under section 25-412.03 shall be deemed to be in compliance with
this section. The board shall keep such buildings in repair and provide
suitable rooms, and offices, furniture, and equipment for the
accommodation of the:
(i) Several several courts of record, Nebraska Workers' Compensation
Court or any judge thereof, Commissioner of Labor for the conduct and
operation of the state free employment service, county board, county
-14-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
clerk, county treasurer, county sheriff, clerk of the district court,
county surveyor, and county agricultural agent; ,
(ii) Clerk of the district court, including in counties in which
there is a clerk of the district and county courts; and
(iii) County county attorney if the county attorney holds his or her
office at the county seat and shall provide suitable furniture and
equipment therefor.
(b) All such courts which desire such accommodation shall be
suitably housed in the courthouse.
(2) No levy exceeding (a) two million dollars in counties having in
excess of two hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, (b) one million dollars
in counties having in excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants and not
in excess of two hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, (c) three hundred
thousand dollars in counties having in excess of thirty thousand
inhabitants and not in excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants, or (d)
one hundred fifty thousand dollars in all other counties shall be made
within a one-year period for any of the purposes specified in subsection
(1) of this section without first submitting the proposition to a vote of
the people of the county at a general election or a special election
ordered by the board for that purpose and obtaining the approval of a
majority of the legal voters thereon.
(3)(a) The county board of any county in this state may, when
requested so to do by petition signed by at least a majority of the legal
voters in the county based on the average vote of the two preceding
general elections, make an annual levy of not to exceed seventeen and
five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of
all the taxable property in the county for any of the purposes specified
in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) If a county on the day it first initiates a project for any of
the purposes specified in subsection (1) of this section had no bonded
indebtedness payable from its general fund levy, the county board may
-15-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
make an annual levy of not to exceed five and two-tenths cents on each
one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property of
the county for a project or projects for any of the purposes specified in
subsection (1) of this section without the filing of a petition described
in subdivision (3)(a) of this section. The county board shall designate
the particular project for which such levy shall be expended, the period
of years, which shall not exceed twenty, for which the tax will be levied
for such project, and the number of cents of the levy for each year
thereof. The county board may designate more than one project and levy a
tax pursuant to this section for each such project, concurrently or
consecutively, as the case may be, if the aggregate levy in each year and
the duration of each levy will not exceed the limitations specified in
this subsection. Each levy for a project which is authorized by this
subdivision may be imposed for such duration specified by the county
board notwithstanding the contemporaneous existence or subsequent
imposition of any other levy or levies for another project or projects
imposed pursuant to this subdivision and notwithstanding the subsequent
issuance by the county of bonded indebtedness payable from its general
fund levy.
Sec. 15. Section 23-121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-121 The county board shall provide and keep in repair, when the
finances of the county will permit, suitable fireproof safes for the
county clerk and county treasurer. It shall provide suitable books and
stationery for the use of the county board, county clerk, county
treasurer, county judge, sheriff, clerk of the district court, county
school administrator, county surveyor, and county attorney.
Sec. 16. Section 23-405, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-405 (1) The commission shall consist of five members who shall be
in sympathy with the application of merit principles to public
-16-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
employment. No member of the commission shall be a member of any local,
state, or national committee of a political party or an officer or member
of a committee in any partisan political club or organization.
(2) The members of the commission shall be as follows:
(a)(i) Until January 7, 2027, two (a) Two elected officers selected
from the offices of and elected by the county commissioners, clerk,
assessor, treasurer, public defender, register of deeds, clerk of the
district court, engineer, and sheriff; and ,
(ii) Beginning January 7, 2027, two elected officers selected from
the offices of and elected by the county commissioners, clerk, assessor,
treasurer, public defender, register of deeds, engineer, and sheriff;
being of opposite political parties if possible, and each party shall
separately select its own member,
(b) Two two full-time permanent county employees; , and
(c) One one public member holding no public or political office.
(3)(a) The two elected officers described in subdivision (2)(a) of
this section shall be affiliated with different political parties if
possible, and each party shall separately select its own member.
(b) The initial two such employees under subdivision (2)(b) of this
section shall be selected by the two elected officers referred to in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section (a) of this subdivision as follows:
Any such employee who is at least twenty-one years of age may submit his
or her name as a candidate to the elected officer of the political party
with which the employee is registered who shall then select one
commission member from such list of names.
(c) The four members of the commission shall then select the public
member.
(4)(a) The commission shall establish employee election procedures
which shall provide that all county employees subject to the County Civil
Service Commission Act may vote and, if not less than twenty-one years of
age, be candidates for a member of the commission.
-17-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(b) One employee member of the commission shall be a Democrat
elected by the Democrat-registered employees subject to the County Civil
Service Commission Act, and one employee member of the commission shall
be a Republican elected by the Republican-registered employees subject to
the County Civil Service Commission Act.
(c) An employee otherwise eligible to vote and be a candidate for
the office of employee member of the commission, but who is not
registered as either a Democrat or a Republican, may become eligible to
vote, and become a candidate for the office of employee member of the
commission by making a declaration that he or she desires to vote for
such a member of the commission, or be a candidate for such office, and,
in the same declaration, designating the party, Democrat or Republican,
with which he or she desires to be affiliated for this purpose. After
making such declaration, that employee shall have the same right to vote
for a candidate, and be a candidate for the office of employee member of
the commission as if the employee were a registered member of the party
so designated in the declaration. The manner, form, and contents of such
declaration shall be initially established by the two elected officials
referred to in subdivision (2)(a) of this section, subject to
modification by the commission after it has been fully formed.
(5) (3) The initial term of office of (a) the two elected officers
shall be three years from May 21, 1971; (b) the initial term of office of
the county employees shall be two years from May 21, 1971; and (c) the
initial term of the public member shall be three years from May 21, 1971.
(6) (4) At the expiration of the initial term of office, a successor
member shall be elected or appointed as provided in the County Civil
Service Commission Act for a term of three years. Membership on the
commission of any member shall terminate upon the resignation of any
member or at such time as the member no longer complies with the
qualifications for election or appointment to the commission. If a
member's term terminates prior to the expiration of the term for which
-18-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
the member was elected or appointed, the commission shall appoint a
successor complying with the same qualifications for the unexpired term.
Sec. 17. Section 23-1114.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
23-1114.03 (1) In counties of Class 2, the county clerk, assessor,
treasurer, sheriff, attorney, and appointive full-time veterans service
officer shall each receive a minimum annual salary of six thousand
dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of the
general fund. and
(2) Until January 7, 2027, in counties of Class 2 entitled by law to
have a clerk of the district court, the clerk of the district court shall
receive a minimum annual salary of fifty-four hundred dollars, to be paid
periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.
Sec. 18. Section 23-1114.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
23-1114.04 (1) In counties of Class 3, the county clerk, assessor,
treasurer, sheriff, attorney, and appointive full-time veterans service
officer , and the clerk of the district court shall each receive a
minimum annual salary of six thousand five hundred dollars, to be paid
periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.
(2) Until January 7, 2027, in counties of Class 3, the clerk of the
district court shall receive a minimum annual salary of six thousand five
hundred dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of
the general fund.
Sec. 19. Section 23-1114.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
23-1114.05 (1) In counties of Class 4, the county clerk, register of
deeds, assessor, treasurer, sheriff, attorney, and appointive full-time
veterans service officer , and the clerk of the district court shall each
receive a minimum annual salary of seventy-five hundred dollars, to be
paid periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.
-19-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(2) Until January 7, 2027, in counties of Class 4, the clerk of the
district court shall receive a minimum annual salary of seventy-five
hundred dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of
the general fund.
Sec. 20. Section 23-1114.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
23-1114.06 (1) In counties of Class 5, the county clerk, register of
deeds, assessor, treasurer, sheriff, attorney, and appointive full-time
veterans service officer , and the clerk of the district court shall each
receive a minimum annual salary of eight thousand dollars, to be paid
periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.
(2) Until January 7, 2027, in counties of Class 5, the clerk of the
district court shall receive a minimum annual salary of eight thousand
dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of the
general fund.
Sec. 21. Section 24-228, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-228 (1) Until January 7, 2027, the The Supreme Court shall assume
as expenses the cost of word processing and data processing hardware and
software involved in the operation of the district courts if those costs
are for services provided on equipment owned by the State of Nebraska and
the services have been approved by the State Court Administrator.
(2)(a) This subsection applies beginning January 7, 2027.
(b) The State of Nebraska shall pay, with funds appropriated to the
Supreme Court, the following operational costs of the district courts and
separate juvenile courts:
(i) Computer hardware and software used for data processing or word
processing if the costs are incurred using equipment owned by the state;
and
(ii) Costs for communication lines arising from data and word
processing pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(i) of this section.
-20-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(c) All property purchased by the county as a district court expense
shall remain the property of the county.
Sec. 22. Section 24-337.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-337.01 (1) When the clerk of the county court or the county court
staff are temporarily unavailable or available on less than a full-time
basis, the clerk of the district court shall, under the direction of the
county court judge and in cooperation and agreement with the Supreme
Court and State Court Administrator, assist the clerk of the county court
in the provision of county court services which would otherwise require
the presence of county court staff. Any agreement entered into under this
section must be signed and stipulated to by the State Court
Administrator, the county board, and the clerk of the district court
after obtaining input from the clerk of the county court, a district
court judge, a county court judge, and the county attorney. Any agreement
entered into under this section may include, but is not limited to,
financial considerations and scheduling.
(2) This section terminates on January 7, 2027.
Sec. 23. Section 24-337.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-337.04 (1) A clerk of the district court elected after 2008 need
not be a resident of the county when he or she files for election as
clerk of the district court, but a clerk of the district court shall
reside in a county for which he or she holds office.
(2) This section terminates on January 7, 2027.
Sec. 24. Section 24-507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-507 (1) There shall be appointed a clerk magistrate to serve each
county. Clerk magistrates shall be appointed by the county judge, or
judges if the district has more than one county judge, and shall serve at
the pleasure of the county judge or judges, subject to personnel rules
-21-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
adopted by the Supreme Court.
(2) The clerk magistrate shall be the clerk of the county court and
if appointed as clerk magistrate for more than one county shall be the
clerk of the county court for each county.
(3) In counties when the district court clerk or staff is
temporarily unavailable and there is not a clerk of the district and
county courts pursuant to sections 1 to 9 of this act, the clerk
magistrate as clerk of the county court shall, under the direction of the
district court judge and in cooperation and agreement with the Supreme
Court , and State Court Administrator, and clerk of the district court,
assist the clerk of the district court in the provision of district court
services which would otherwise require the presence of district court
staff.
(4) Any agreements pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) or subsection (3)
of section 32-524, as such section existed prior to the operative date of
this section, shall terminate on the operative date of this section.
(5) In a county where there is a clerk of the district and county
courts, any clerk magistrate duties shall be assigned according to the
consolidation plan developed under sections 1 to 9 of this act. Any clerk
magistrate holding office on the operative date of this section may
continue to perform clerk magistrate duties if he or she desires and
shall serve at the pleasure of the county judge or judges, subject to the
personnel rules adopted by the Supreme Court. The title of clerk
magistrate shall be used by the person to whom clerk magistrate duties
have been assigned when performing clerk magistrate duties. Any agreement
entered into under this subsection must be signed and stipulated to by
the State Court Administrator, the county board, and the clerk of the
district court after obtaining input from the clerk of the county court,
a district court judge, a county court judge, and the county attorney.
Any agreement entered into under this subsection may include, but is not
limited to, financial considerations and scheduling.
-22-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(4) When an agreement has been reached pursuant to subdivision (1)
(b) of section 32-524 or subsection (3) of section 32-524 for a clerk
magistrate as clerk of the county court to be ex officio clerk of the
district court, the clerk magistrate shall perform the duties required by
law of the clerk of the district court under the direction of the
district court judge for the county and the State Court Administrator.
Sec. 25. Section 24-508, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-508 (1) In a county where there is not a clerk of the district
and county courts:
(a) Clerk magistrates may be assigned by the presiding county judge
to perform the duties of a clerk magistrate in any other county within
the district; .
(b) (2) A person shall be eligible for appointment as a clerk
magistrate if he or she is a graduate of a high school or holds a
certificate of equivalency issued by the State Board of Education; and .
(c) (3) A clerk magistrate shall comply with the Supreme Court
judicial branch education requirements as required by the Supreme Court.
(2) In a county where there is a clerk of the district and county
courts, a person may perform the duties of the clerk magistrate if such
person:
(a) Is a graduate of a high school or holds a certificate of
equivalency issued by the State Board of Education;
(b) Meets any additional qualifications established by the Supreme
Court; and
(c) Complies with the Supreme Court's judicial branch education
requirements.
Sec. 26. Section 24-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-509 Each county judge, and clerk magistrate, and clerk of the
district and county courts, before assuming the duties of office, shall
-23-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
take the oath prescribed by law for district judges. Such oaths Oaths of
county judges shall be filed with the Secretary of State. Oaths of clerk
magistrates shall be filed in the office of the county clerk.
Sec. 27. Section 33-106.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
33-106.02 (1) The clerk of the district court or clerk of the
district and county courts of each county shall not retain for his or her
own use any fees, revenue, perquisites, or receipts, fixed, enumerated,
or provided in this or any other section of the statutes of the State of
Nebraska or any fees authorized by federal law to be collected or
retained by a county official. The clerk shall on or before the fifteenth
day of each month make a report to the county board, under oath, showing
the different items of such fees, revenue, perquisites, or receipts
received, from whom, at what time, and for what service, and the total
amount received by such officer since the last report, and also the
amount received for the current year.
(2) The clerk shall account for and pay any fees, revenue,
perquisites, or receipts not later than the fifteenth day of the month
following the calendar month in which such fees, revenue, perquisites, or
receipts were received in the following manner:
(a) Of the forty-two-dollar docket fee imposed pursuant to section
33-106, one dollar shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the General Fund and six dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges through June 30,
2021. Beginning July 1, 2021, seven dollars of such forty-two-dollar
docket fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges;
(b) Of the twenty-seven-dollar docket fee imposed for appeal of a
criminal case to the district court pursuant to section 33-106, two
dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges; and
-24-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
(c) The remaining fees, revenue, perquisites, or receipts shall be
credited to the general fund of the county.
Sec. 28. Section 43-512.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-512.05 (1) Until January 7, 2027, it It shall be the duty of the
clerks of the district courts to furnish the Department of Health and
Human Services monthly statistical information and any other information
required by the department to properly account for child, spousal, and
medical support payments. The clerk of each district court shall
negotiate and enter into a written agreement with the department in order
to receive reimbursement for the costs incurred in carrying out sections
43-512 to 43-512.10 and 43-512.12 to 43-512.18.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, it shall be the duty of the clerks
of the district and county courts to furnish the department monthly
statistical information and any other information required by the
department to properly account for child, spousal, and medical support
payments. On behalf of such clerks, the State Court Administrator shall
negotiate and enter into a written agreement with the department to
receive reimbursement for the costs incurred in carrying out sections
43-512 to 43-512.10 and 43-512.12 to 43-512.18.
(b) Beginning January 7, 2027, it shall be the duty of the clerks of
the district courts and the clerks of district and county courts to
furnish the department monthly statistical information and any other
information required by the department to properly account for child,
spousal, and medical support payments. On behalf of such clerks, the
State Court Administrator shall negotiate and enter into a written
agreement with the department to receive reimbursement for the costs
incurred in carrying out sections 43-512 to 43-512.10 and 43-512.12 to
43-512.18.
(c) Any federal fund reimbursement received for direct costs as
provided in this subsection shall be transferred to the State Treasurer
-25-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
for credit to Agency 5 – Supreme Court.
(3) (2) The department and the governing board of the county, county
attorney, or authorized attorney may enter into a written agreement
regarding the determination of paternity and child, spousal, and medical
support enforcement for the purpose of implementing such sections.
Paternity shall be established when it can be determined that the
collection of child support is feasible.
(4) (3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations regarding the rate and manner of reimbursement for costs
incurred in carrying out such sections, taking into account relevant
federal law, available federal funds, and any appropriations made by the
Legislature. Except as provided in subdivision (2)(c) of this section,
Any reimbursement funds shall be added to the budgets of those county
officials who have performed the services as called for in the
cooperative agreements and carried over from year to year as required by
law.
Sec. 29. Section 71-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-915 (1) The presiding judge in each district court judicial
district shall create at least one but not more than three mental health
boards in such district and shall appoint sufficient members and
alternate members to such boards. Members and alternate members of a
mental health board shall be appointed for four-year terms. The presiding
judge may remove members and alternate members of the board at his or her
discretion. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same
manner as provided for the original appointment. Members of the mental
health board shall have the same immunity as judges of the district
court.
(2) Each mental health board shall consist of an attorney licensed
to practice law in this state and any two of the following but not more
than one from each category: A physician, a psychologist, a psychiatric
-26-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
nurse, a licensed clinical social worker or a licensed independent
clinical social worker, a licensed independent mental health practitioner
who is not a social worker, or a layperson with a demonstrated interest
in mental health and substance dependency issues. The presiding judge
shall not appoint a clerk magistrate, clerk of the district court, or
clerk of the district and county courts to serve on a mental health
board. The attorney shall be chairperson of the board. Members and
alternate members of a mental health board shall take and subscribe an
oath to support the United States Constitution and the Constitution of
Nebraska and to faithfully discharge the duties of the office according
to law.
(3) The mental health board shall have the power to issue subpoenas,
to administer oaths, and to do any act necessary and proper for the board
to carry out its duties. No mental health board hearing shall be
conducted unless three members or alternate members are present and able
to vote. Any action taken at any mental health board hearing shall be by
majority vote.
(4) The mental health board shall prepare and file an annual
inventory statement with the county board of its county of all county
personal property in its custody or possession. Members of the mental
health board shall be compensated and shall be reimbursed for their
actual and necessary expenses by the county or counties being served by
such board. Compensation shall be at an hourly rate to be determined by
the presiding judge of the district court, except that such compensation
shall not be less than fifty dollars for each hearing of the board.
Members shall also be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses,
not including charges for meals. Mileage shall be determined pursuant to
section 23-1112.
Sec. 30. Section 71-957, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-957 All proceedings held under the Nebraska Mental Health
-27-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act shall be of record, and
all oral proceedings shall be reported verbatim by either a qualified
stenographic or digital shorthand reporter or by tape-recording equipment
equivalent in quality to that required in county courts by section
25-2732. The written findings of the mental health board shall be part of
the subject's records and shall be available to the parties in the case
and to the treatment facility where the subject is receiving treatment
pursuant to a commitment order of the mental health board under section
71-925 or 71-1209. Any qualified stenographic or digital shorthand
reporter who reports proceedings presided over by a board or otherwise
than in his or her capacity as an official district court stenographic
reporter shall apply to the court for reasonable expenses and fees for
services performed in such hearings. The court shall fix reasonable
expenses and fees, and the county board shall allow payment to the
reporter in the full amount fixed by the court.
Sec. 31. Sections 15, 24, 25, 26, 29, 32, and 35 of this act become
operative January 1, 2026. Sections 30 and 33 of this act become
operative three calendar months after the adjournment of this legislative
session. The other sections of this act become operative on their
effective date.
Sec. 32. Original sections 22-417, 23-121, 24-507, 24-508, 24-509,
and 71-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 33. Original section 71-957, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 34. Original sections 11-119, 11-125, 11-126, 23-120, 23-405,
23-1114.03, 23-1114.04, 23-1114.05, 23-1114.06, 24-228, 24-337.01,
24-337.04, and 43-512.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
section 33-106.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 35. The following section is outright repealed: Section
32-524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-28-

LB216 LB216
2025 2025
Sec. 36. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-29-